trunk/src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic.aff
FLAG num
SFX 265 Y 11
SFX 265 0 h/2,1003 . +NSuff-h
SFX 265 0 hmA/2,1003 . +NSuff-h
SFX 265 0 hm/2,1003 . +NSuff-h
SFX 265 0 hA/2,1003 . +NSuff-h
SFX 265 0 hn/2,1003 . +NSuff-h
SFX 265 0 k/2,1003 . +NSuff-h
SFX 265 0 k/2,1003 . +NSuff-h
SFX 265 0 kmA/2,1003 . +NSuff-h
SFX 265 0 km/2,1003 . +NSuff-h
SFX 265 0 kn/2,1003 . +NSuff-h
SFX 265 0 nA/2,1003 . +NSuff-h
SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152 0 0/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0a
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 0 0/2,1059 . +Suff-0
SFX 66 Y 1
SFX 66 0 0/2,1000 . +PVSuff-0a
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 0 |t/2,1003 . +NSuff-|t
SFX 268 Y 1
SFX 268 0 yn/2,1003 . +NSuff-iyna
SFX 496 Y 7
SFX 496 0 h/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 496 0 hmA/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 496 0 hm/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 496 0 hA/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 496 0 hn/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 496 0 ny/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 496 0 nA/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|h
